Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1756
Central credit union; loans and investments; limitations.

All member credit unions may borrow and invest up to an amount specified by the board of directors of the central credit union in accordance with the limitation of section 21-1791. The central credit union may purchase all or any part of a loan originated by a member credit union to one of its individual members, who does not need to be a member of the central credit union.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 56.